North Carolina, session 2025, SB29.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160D-602 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-602. Notice of hearing on proposed zoning map amendments.
…
(f) Delegation. – The governing board may, by ordinance, delegate to the planning board
the authority to conduct the hearing required under this Article and make the final decision on
zoning map amendment proposals, including the adoption of a consistency statement pursuant to
this Article. The governing board may prescribe procedures for the hearing that are not
inconsistent with this Article. The planning board shall make its final decision by majority vote
of the members of the planning board. Any person with standing may appeal a decision of the
planning board made pursuant to this subsection to the governing board by providing written
notice to the clerk to the governing board within 15 days of the final decision. On appeal, the
governing board shall review the decision of the planning board de novo. If no notice of appeal
of the planning board decision is provided within 15 days of the final decision, then the decision
of the planning board shall be final and equivalent to the final decision of the governing board.
The governing board may, by ordinance, rescind or modify any authority delegated to the
planning board pursuant to this subsection."
SECTION 2. This act applies to Onslow County.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S29-v-2*